Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-108
Future interest; subject to claims of creditors.

The subjection to the claims of creditors of a future interest, whether legal or equitable, is not prevented or avoided on the sole ground that such interest is future or contingent.

Laws 1941, c. 153, § 8, p. 596;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 76-1008;

R.S.1943, § 76-108.